Maine, session 132, LD229.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§1-F, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. DD, §3, is
amended to read:
1-F. Single individuals and married persons filing separate returns; tax years
beginning from 2017 to 2025. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017 but
before January 1, 2026, for single individuals and married persons filing separate returns:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $21,050 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $21,050 but less than $50,000 $1,221 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$21,050
$50,000 or more $3,175 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$50,000
137 Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§1-G is enacted to read:
1-G. Single individuals and married persons filing separate returns; tax years
beginning 2026. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, for single individuals
and married persons filing separate returns:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $41,600 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $41,600 but less than $85,000 $2,413 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$41,600
At least $85,000 but less than $144,500 $5,343 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$85,000
At least $144,500 but less than $205,000 $9,597 plus 7.52% of the excess over
$144,500
At least $205,000 but less than $500,000 $14,147 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$205,000
$500,000 or more $35,240 plus 8.2% of the excess over
$500,000
2197 Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§2-F, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. DD, §5, is
3108 amended to read:
2-F. Heads of households; tax years beginning from 2017 to 2025. For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2017 but before January 1, 2026, for unmarried individuals
or legally separated individuals who qualify as heads of households:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $31,550 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $31,550 but less than $75,000 $1,830 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$31,550
$75,000 or more $4,763 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$75,000
4304 Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§2-G is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0424(01)

2-G. Heads of households; tax years beginning 2026. For tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2026, for unmarried individuals or legally separated individuals who
qualify as heads of households:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $62,400 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $62,400 but less than $127,500 $3,619 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$62,400
At least $127,500 but less than $216,750 $8,013 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$127,500
At least $216,750 but less than $307,500 $14,394 plus 7.52% of the excess over
$216,750
At least $307,500 but less than $750,000 $21,218 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$307,500
$750,000 or more $52,857 plus 8.2% of the excess over
$750,000
164 Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§3-F, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. DD, §7, is
175 amended to read:
3-F. Individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses; tax years
beginning from 2017 to 2025. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017 but
before January 1, 2026, for individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses
permitted to file a joint return:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $42,100 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $42,100 but less than $100,000 $2,442 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$42,100
$100,000 or more $6,350 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$100,000
2282 Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§3-G is enacted to read:
3-G. Individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses; tax years
beginning 2026. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, for individuals filing
married joint returns or surviving spouses permitted to file a joint return:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $83,200 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $83,200 but less than $170,000 $4,826 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$83,200
At least $170,000 but less than $289,000 $10,685 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$170,000
At least $289,000 but less than $410,000 $19,194 plus 7.52% of the excess over
$289,000
At least $410,000 but less than $1,000,000 $28,293 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$410,000
$1,000,000 or more $70,478 plus 8.2% of the excess over
$1,000,000
Page 2 - 132LR0424(01)

Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. DD, §33, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
1. Individual income tax rate tables. Beginning in 2025 and each year thereafter, by
the dollar amounts of the tax rate tables specified in section 5111, subsections 1-G, 2-G
and 3-G, except that for the purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding section 5402,
subsection 1-B, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer Price Index for
the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year divided by the
Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30, 2024;